Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 5.7
HOMELESS YOUTH

Section

26-5.7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Homeless Youth Act".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 977, § 2, effective May 22.

26-5.7-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 5.7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"County department" means the county, city and county, or district department of human or social services.

"Homeless youth" means a child or youth who is at least eleven years of age but is less than twenty-one years of age and who:

Lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; or

Has a primary nighttime residence that is:

A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations; or

A public or private place not designed for, nor ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

"Homeless youth" shall not include any individual imprisoned or otherwise detained pursuant to an act of congress or a state law.

"Homeless youth shelter" means a facility that is licensed pursuant to section 26-6-905.

(3.5) "Licensed host family home" means a home that meets the requirements established by the state board by rule pursuant to section 26-6-909 (6).

"Parent" means the legal custodian or guardian of the youth.

"Youth" or "child" means any person who is at least eleven years of age but is less than twenty-one years of age.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 977, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2011:

(2) and (5) amended and (3.5) added, (HB 11-1079), ch. 83, p. 223, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

IP and (1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 449, § 124, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(3) and (3.5) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 858, § 101, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-5.7-103. Family reconciliation services.

Out of moneys appropriated to the state department for family reconciliation services, the state department may elect to contract directly with private nonprofit organizations or entities for the provision of family intervention reconciliation services or pass the moneys to a county department electing to provide such services. In such circumstances, the county department may provide the family intervention reconciliation services directly or the county department may contract with private nonprofit organizations or entities for the provision of such services. The county may also contract with private nonprofit organizations or entities for the provision of voluntary alternative residences pursuant to sections 26-5.7-107 and 26-5.7-108.

Any county department may elect to establish a program to provide services consistent with this article. If a county department so elects, it shall notify the state department of such action, and any homeless youth or any member of a family that is in conflict or is experiencing problems with a homeless youth may request family reconciliation services from the county department. Such services may be provided to alleviate personal or family situations that present a serious and imminent threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the youth or family and to maintain intact families wherever possible. Services shall be provided at the discretion of the county department, within the county department's available resources.

Family reconciliation services that may be established shall be designed to develop skills and support within families to resolve problems related to homeless youth or family conflicts and may include, but are not limited to, referral services for suicide prevention, family preservation services, psychiatric or other medical care, or psychological, welfare, legal, educational, mediation, or other social services such as temporary shelter or independent living, as appropriate to the needs of the youth and the family. County departments that elect to provide family educational reconciliation services shall work in cooperation with school district boards of education providing educational services to homeless children in order to jointly develop educational programs for homeless youth consistent with section 22-33-103.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 977, § 2, effective May 22.

26-5.7-104. Taking youth into custody - transporting to residence or child care facility or homeless youth shelter.

A law enforcement officer may take a youth into temporary custody without an order of the court under the following circumstances:

If a law enforcement agency has been contacted by the youth's parent and informed that the youth is absent from parental custody without consent; or

If an officer has reasonable cause to believe, considering the youth's age, the youth's location, and the time of day, that the youth is in circumstances that constitute a danger to the youth's safety.

Law enforcement custody pursuant to this section shall not extend beyond the amount of time reasonably necessary to transport the youth to a destination authorized pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of a law enforcement officer to take a youth into custody and follow the procedures established pursuant to article 2.5 or 3 of title 19, C.R.S.

A law enforcement officer taking a youth into custody pursuant to this section shall inform the youth of the reason for such custody and shall comply with either of the following:

The officer shall transport the youth to the home of the youth's parent. The officer releasing the youth into the custody of the youth's parent shall inform the parent of the reason for taking the youth into custody and shall inform the youth and the parent of the nature and location of any family reconciliation services available in their community.

The officer shall take the youth to a licensed child care facility or to a licensed homeless youth shelter if:

The youth evinces fear or distress at the prospect of being returned to the home of the youth's parent;

It is not practical to transport the youth to the home of the youth's parent; or

There is no parent available to accept custody of the youth.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 978, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2981, § 67, effective August 10.

26-5.7-105. Child care facilities - homeless youth shelters - authority - duties - rules.

Licensed child care facilities, licensed homeless youth shelters, and licensed host family homes may provide shelter and crisis intervention, family reconciliation, and alternative residential services to homeless youth. Homeless youth who are fifteen years of age or older may consent, in writing, to receive such shelter and services without parental consent when in accordance with rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.

Any youth admitted to a licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or licensed host family home pursuant to this article 5.7 and who is not returned to the home of the youth's parent or legal guardian or is not placed in a voluntary alternative residential placement pursuant to section 26-5.7-107 shall reside at a facility, shelter, or licensed host family home described in subsection (1) of this section for a period not to exceed twenty-one days from the time of intake except as otherwise provided in this article 5.7. A licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or a licensed host family home shall make a concerted effort to achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a reconciliation and voluntary return of the youth have not been achieved within seventy-two hours from the time of intake and the director of the facility or shelter, or other person in charge, does not consider it likely that reconciliation will be achieved within the twenty-one-day period, then the director of the facility or shelter, or other person in charge, shall provide the youth and the youth's parent or legal guardian with a statement identifying:

The availability of counseling services;

The availability of longer term residential arrangements; and

The possibility of referral to the county department.

The state department shall develop a written statement of the rights and counseling services set forth in subsection (2) of this section and distribute the statement to each law enforcement agency, licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, and licensed host family home. Each law enforcement officer taking a youth into custody pursuant to this article 5.7 shall provide the youth and the youth's parent or legal guardian with a copy of the statement. Each licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, and licensed host family home shall provide each resident youth and the youth's parent or legal guardian with a copy of the statement.

When a youth under fifteen years of age is admitted to a licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or licensed host family home, the director of the facility, shelter, or other person in charge shall notify the county department within seventy-two hours of the youth's admission.

If the director of the facility, shelter, or other person in charge determines that a referral for additional services needs to be made, the director or other person in charge shall make the referral to the appropriate county department, notify the county department of the facility's relationship to the youth pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(e.5)(I), and notify the county department of the date when the twenty-one-day shelter time period will expire.

A licensed foster care home approved as a licensed host family home shall not accept a homeless youth for placement under this section if there are any foster children currently placed in the home.

If a youth who is at least eleven years of age but less than fifteen years of age has been served up to twenty-one days and returns to the licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or licensed host family home after leaving the facility, shelter, or host home, the director of the licensed child care facility or licensed homeless youth shelter or other person in charge shall make a referral for services to the county department.

The state department shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 979, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1079), ch. 83, p. 224, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2015:

(6) amended, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1020, § 16, effective June 2.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-106), ch. 128, p. 552, § 2, effective September 14.

26-5.7-106. Notification.

Any person who provides shelter to a youth without the consent of the youth's parent or legal guardian and after said person knows that the youth is away from the home of the youth's parent or legal guardian without permission shall notify the youth's parent, legal guardian, or a law enforcement officer that the youth is being sheltered within twenty-four hours after shelter has been provided and after acquiring knowledge that the youth is away from the home of the youth's parent or legal guardian without permission. If the youth refuses to provide the shelter with contact information for the youth's parent or legal guardian, the youth's parent or legal guardian is deceased, or the shelter director or other person in charge believes that notifying the parent or legal guardian would not be in the youth's best interest due to an imminent risk of abuse or neglect by the parent or legal guardian, the shelter shall notify the appropriate county department.

Upon admission of a youth to a licensed child care facility or licensed homeless youth shelter pursuant to this article 5.7, the facility or shelter shall:

Notify the youth's parent, legal guardian, or appropriate county department of the youth's whereabouts, physical and emotional condition, and the circumstances surrounding the youth's placement within twenty-four hours;

Notify the youth's parent or legal guardian that it is the paramount concern of the facility or shelter to achieve a reconciliation between the parent or legal guardian and the youth, to reunify the family, and to inform the parent or legal guardian about available alternatives;

Arrange transportation for the youth to the residence of the youth's parent or legal guardian when the youth and the parent or legal guardian agree that the youth shall return to the home of the youth's parent or legal guardian. The parent or legal guardian shall reimburse the party who paid for the transportation costs to the extent of the parent's or legal guardian's ability.

Arrange transportation for the youth to an alternative residential placement facility when the youth and the youth's parent or legal guardian agree to such placement. The parent or legal guardian shall reimburse the appropriate person for transportation costs to the extent of the parent's or legal guardian's ability.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 980, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-106), ch. 128, p. 554, § 3, effective September 14.

26-5.7-107. Voluntary alternative residence - parental agreement.

Any available family reconciliation services shall be provided to a youth and the youth's family when the youth voluntarily resides elsewhere than with the youth's parent. A youth and the youth's parent may enter into an agreement for a voluntary alternative residence out of the home. Any agreement for voluntary alternative residence shall be in writing signed by both the youth and the youth's parent and may include, but is not limited to, residence with a relative or other responsible adult, in a licensed child care facility, or in a licensed homeless youth shelter. Voluntary alternative residence may continue as long as there is agreement between the youth and the youth's parent.

Agreements for voluntary alternative residence pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may include arrangements for payment to the party providing the residence for the youth or other responsibilities.

A person assuming responsibility under the agreement for the provision of a residence for the youth shall have the authority to:

Enroll the youth in the school district in which the voluntary alternative residence is located; and

Authorize and obtain preventive medical and dental care and treatment for the youth.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 980, § 2, effective May 22.

26-5.7-108. Voluntary alternative residence - lack of parental agreement.

If the youth and the youth's parent cannot agree on an initial voluntary alternative residence within twenty-one days after admission to the alternative out-of-home residence, a referral to the county department may be made.

The licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or licensed host family home to which the youth has been admitted may arrange for the establishment of a supervised independent living arrangement or may arrange a voluntary residential agreement between the youth and a relative or other responsible adult, a licensed child care facility, a licensed homeless youth shelter, or a licensed host family home if the youth has been admitted to a licensed child care facility, licensed homeless youth shelter, or licensed host family home and:

Twenty-one days have passed since admission;

The youth's parent cannot be found after diligent effort by the facility or shelter to locate such parent, the youth's parent has failed to respond to a notice sent by the facility or shelter, or the youth's parent has renounced responsibility for the youth; and

The youth has no suitable place to live other than the home of the youth's parent.

A supervised independent living arrangement can only be established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section if:

The youth has not been deemed to have a substance use disorder and is in need of treatment;

The youth is not currently demonstrating behavior that poses a danger to the youth or others;

The youth is not engaging in persistent high-risk behavior that renders the youth inappropriate for an independent living arrangement through a placement alternative commission plan pursuant to section 19-1-116, C.R.S., or foster care placement through the county department; and

The youth has an ability and capacity to manage his or her own affairs, demonstrates emotional independence, and has the opportunity and ability to achieve financial independence through legitimate activities and life skills, including the following:

Educational accomplishments or a plan for achieving educational goals;

A vocational plan or goal; and

An opportunity or ability to achieve adequate housing and living arrangements apart from the youth's parent, guardian, or custodian.

For the purposes of this article, a voluntary residential agreement shall not require the county department to assume custody of the youth or to exercise any parental power or control over the youth or require medical assistance under articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

A person assuming responsibility for the youth shall have the authority to:

Enroll the youth in the school district in which the youth resides, pursuant to the voluntary residential agreement; and

Authorize and obtain preventive medical and dental care and treatment for the youth.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 981, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2006:

(4)(a) amended, p. 2018, § 104, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1), IP(2), and (2)(a) amended, (HB 11-1079), ch. 83, p. 225, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1334, § 222, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-5.7-109. No use of general fund moneys. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 982, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 286, § 1, effective August 3.